Georgia, session 2025_26, HB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 5C of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to alternative ad
valorem tax on motor vehicles, is amended in Code Section 48-5C-1, relating to definitions,
exemption from taxation, allocation and disbursement of proceeds, fair market value of
vehicle appealable, and report, by revising paragraph (2) as follows:
"(2) 'Immediate family member' means spouse, parent, child, sibling, grandparent, or
grandchild."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 274
- 1 -

LC 50 1022
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 274
- 2 -